Illinois, session 104th, SB3951.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Highway Code is amended by adding 5Section 9-133 as follows: 6    (605 ILCS 5/9-133 new)7    Sec. 9-133. Pavement markings near fire hydrants and water 8supplies. A unit of local government may apply and maintain 9blue pavement markings on any highway, street, or road to mark 10the location of a fire hydrant or water supply near the side of 11the highway, street, or road. Blue pavement markings used for 12this purpose shall consist of a 4-inch square. A unit of local 13government shall not place or maintain blue pavement markings 14on a highway unless the unit of local government first obtains 15an encroachment permit from the agency having jurisdiction 16over the highway.17    This Section does not apply to freeways or freeway ramps.